Utah statutes.
16-10a-824.   Quorum and voting.

(1)  Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws require a greater number, or, as permitted in Subsection (2), a lower number, a quorum of a board of directors consists of:

(a)  a majority of the fixed number of directors if the corporation has a fixed board size; or

(b)  a majority of the number of directors prescribed, or if no number is prescribed, of the number in office immediately before the meeting begins, if a range for the size of the board is established pursuant to Subsection 16-10a-803(2).

(2)  The articles of incorporation or bylaws may authorize a quorum of a board of directors to consist of no fewer than 1/3 of the fixed or prescribed number of directors determined under Subsection (1).

(3)  If a quorum is present when a vote is taken, the affirmative vote of a majority of directors present is the act of the board of directors unless the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or this chapter require the vote of a greater number of directors.

(4)  A director who is present at a meeting of the board of directors when corporate action is taken is considered to have assented to the action taken at the meeting unless:

(a)  the director objects at the beginning of the meeting, or promptly upon arrival, to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting and does not thereafter vote for or assent to any action taken at the meeting;

(b)  the director contemporaneously requests his dissent or abstention as to any specific action to be entered into the minutes of the meeting; or

(c)  the director causes written notice of a dissent or abstention as to any specific action to be received by the presiding officer of the meeting before adjournment of the meeting or by the corporation promptly after adjournment of the meeting.

(5)  The right of dissent or abstention as to a specific action pursuant to Subsection (4) is not available to a director who votes in favor of the action taken.

